src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON BASSTEL !!= @CODE@ Adjs on -et, -l, -r, sm om -k, -sj with attr -is and no consonant gradation. As b. in Spiik. Sg Acc: basstelav, Attr: basstelis. Many of these entries might be instances of derivations, like belak, deblak, and maybe also basstel, bargán.
                 +A:is%> ATTR           ;
! +A:is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:     VUOHTA         ;
                 +A:%>   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:%>   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>it ENDLEX         ;
        +A+Cmp/SgNom:%>   R              ;
                 +A:%>   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: goavrret # Odd-syllable test
!!€ goavrret:               goavrret+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ goavrredav:            goavrret+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ goavrredis:               goavrret+A+Attr
!!€ goavrredabbo:          goavrret+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON DABÁR !!= @CODE@ Adjectives on -r. With attr -is like BASSTEL, but with CG. Sg Acc: dahparav, Attr: dabáris. Presently only for dabár. Consonant gradation.
                 +A:%>Q1is ATTR           ;
! +A:%>Q1is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:%>Q1   VUOHTA         ;
                 +A:%>Q1   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:%>     OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:%>     ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>it   ENDLEX         ;
        +A+Cmp/SgNom:%>Q1   R              ;
                 +A:%>     ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: sihkar # Odd-syllable test
!!€ dabár:               dabár+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ dahparav:            dabár+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ dabáris:             dabár+A+Attr
!!€ dahparabbo:          dabár+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON MUTTÁK !!= @CODE@ Adjs on -ák/-ak/-ek, two attr: -is and same as pred. As c. in Spiik. Sg Acc: muttágav, Attr: muttágis and mutták. These seem to be instances of the adjectival -k derivation. Unclear whether such derivation have different attr forms or not, and thats maybe why some of these derivations are found in BASSTEL lexicon.
                 +A:%>   ATTR           ;
          +A+Use/NG:is%> ATTR           ;
! +A: VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
! +A:is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:%>   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:%>   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>it ENDLEX         ;
        +A+Cmp/SgNom:%>   R              ;
                 +A:%>   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: bárvak # Odd-syllable test
!!€ bárvak:               bárvak+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ bárvagav:             bárvak+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ bárvak:               bárvak+A+Attr
!!€ bárvagis:               bárvak+A+Attr
!!€ bárvagabbo:           bárvak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON SKÁRBAK !!= @CODE@  Presently only for skárbak, because it has skárbbis attr not skárbagis according to Korhonen. It might be a hybrid. Consonant gradation.
                 +A:bis%>    ATTR           ;
! +A:is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A:a%>Q1k   VUOHTA         ;
                 +A:a%>Q1k   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                 +A:a%>Q1g   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                 +A:a%>Q1g   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:a%>Q1git ENDLEX         ;
        +A+Cmp/SgNom:a%>Q1t   R              ;
                 +A:a%>Q1g   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: skárbak # Odd-syllable test
!!€ skárbak:               skárbak+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ skárbagav:             skárbak+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ skárbbis:              skárbak+A+Attr
!!€ skárbagabbo:           skárbak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON ALLAK !!= @CODE@ Adjs on -ak, attr.on -a. Have both gasep/gaggagabbo and alep/allagabbo as comparatives. As d. in Spiik. So far only the adjectives "allak" and "gassak" go to this lexicon.
                                     +A:a%>           ATTR           ;
! +A:a VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                                     +A:ak            VUOHTA         ;
                                     +A:ak%>          N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                                     +A:ag%>          OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                                     +A:e%>Q1         BU/MUS         ;
                                     +A+Use/NG:ag%>          ABBO/AMOS      ;
! +A+Comp:e%>Q1 BUStem ;
! +A+Superl:e%>Q1muss BUOREMUS ;
! +A+Comp+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ag%>appot K ;
! +A+Superl+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ag%>abmus%>it K ;
          +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:e»Q1busj%>    ENDLEX         ;
              +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg:e»Q1busj%>    ATTR           ;
                 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1buttja%>  ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN  ;
 +Err/Lex+Use/-Spell+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1budtja%>  ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN  ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:e»Q1buttja%>t ENDLEX         ;
                     +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ag%>it        ENDLEX          ;
                            +A+Cmp/SgNom:ak%>          R              ;
                                      +A:ag%>          ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: gassak # Odd-syllable test
!!€ gassak:               gassak+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ gassagav:             gassak+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ gassa:                gassak+A+Attr
!!€ gassagabbo:           gassak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€ gasep:                gassak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON GÅBDDÅK !!= @CODE@  Adjs on -åk, attr. on -å. Has even-syllable comparison: gåbdep and gåbdemus. So far "gåbddåk" is the only word in this lexicon. As d2. in Spiik. Sg Acc: gåbddågav, Attr: gåbddå.
                                     +A:å%>           ATTR           ;
! +A:å VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                                     +A:åk            VUOHTA         ;
                                     +A:åk%>          N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                                     +A:åg%>          OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                                     +A:e%>Q1         BU/MUS         ;
! +A+Comp:e%>Q1 BUStem ;
! +A+Superl:e%>Q1muss BUOREMUS ;
                +A+Comp+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:åg%>appot     ENDLEX         ;
              +A+Superl+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:åg%>abmus%>it ENDLEX         ;
            +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:e»Q1busj%>    ENDLEX         ;
                +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg:e»Q1busj%>    ATTR           ;
                   +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1buttja%>  ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN  ;
+Err/Lex+Use/-Spell+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1budtja%>  ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN  ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:e»Q1buttja%>t ENDLEX         ;
                     +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:åg%>it        ENDLEX         ;
                             +A+Cmp/SgNom:åk%>          R              ;
                                       +A:åg%>          ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: gåbddåk # Odd-syllable test
!!€ gåbddåk:               gåbddåk+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ gåbddågav:             gåbddåk+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ gåbddå:                gåbddåk+A+Attr
!!€ gåbdep:           gåbddåk+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
