src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
ajik+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ajeg9 BASSTEL ; !
ajpik+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ajpig9 BASSTEL ; !
allak:all ALLAK ;
arvuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:arvug9 BASSTEL ; !
bargok+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bargog9 BASSTEL ; !
bargán+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bargán BASSTEL ; !
basstel:basstel BASSTEL ;
belak:belag9 BASSTEL ;
biedok+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:biedog9 BASSTEL ; !
biektel:biektel BASSTEL ;
bievrek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bievreg9 BASSTEL ; !
bijtik+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bijtig9 BASSTEL ; !
bivtjok:bivtjog9 BASSTEL ;
bivvil:bivvil BASSTEL ;
buoljok:buoljog9 BASSTEL ;
buskisj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:buskitj BASSTEL ; !
bájnuk:bájnug9 BASSTEL ;
bárvak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bárvag9 MUTTÁK ; !
bånjek:bånjeg9 BASSTEL ;
dabár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dahpar DABÁR ; !
dajvak:dajvag9 BASSTEL ;
delak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:delag9 BASSTEL ; !
diehtemvájnok+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:diehtem#vájnog9 BASSTEL ; !
diejddis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:diejddis BASSTEL ; !
dimuk:dimug9 BASSTEL ;
doajmmel+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:doajmmel BASSTEL ; !
doarek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:doareg9 BASSTEL ; !
duolak:duolag9 BASSTEL ;
duolbuk:duolbug9 BASSTEL ;
durudáruk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:durudárug9 BASSTEL ; !
dámuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dámug9 BASSTEL ; !
dåbddel+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dåbddel BASSTEL ; !
dågun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dågun BASSTEL ; !
dållågierddis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dållå#gierddis BASSTEL ; !
elissjervak:elis#sjervag9 BASSTEL ;
erluk:erlug9 BASSTEL ;
fáldáhkin:fáldáhkin BASSTEL ;
gassak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gass ALLAK ; !
gassjel+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gassjel BASSTEL ; !
gavvarisnjunják+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gavvaris#njunjág9 BASSTEL ; !
geduk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gedug9 BASSTEL ; !
giddis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:giddis BASSTEL ; !
giejddis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:giejddis BASSTEL ; !
gieruk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gierug9 BASSTEL ; !
girjak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:girjag9 MUTTÁK ; !
gisjuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gisjug9 BASSTEL ; !
goagŋet:goagŋed9 BASSTEL ;
goavrret:goavrred9 BASSTEL ;
guhkesgierddis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guhkes#gierddis BASSTEL ; !
guojttel:guojttel BASSTEL ;
gurák+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gurág9 BASSTEL ; !
gájok:gájog9 BASSTEL ;
gávak:gávag9 BASSTEL ;
gåbddel:gåbddel BASSTEL ;
gåbddåk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gåbdd GÅBDDÅK ; !
gåmok:gåmog9 BASSTEL ;
gærggok+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gærggog9 BASSTEL ; !
harvuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:harvug9 BASSTEL ; !
herluk:herlug9 BASSTEL ;
hussil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hussil BASSTEL ; !
hálmuk:hálmug9 BASSTEL ;
hæhkkaráduk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hæhkka#rádug9 BASSTEL ; !Kintel
hærvok+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hærvog9 BASSTEL ; !
iehpelæjdok+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iehpe#læjdog9 BASSTEL ; !
jaskuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jaskug9 BASSTEL ; !
jåhtel+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jåhtel BASSTEL ; !
jålek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jåleg9 MUTTÁK ; !
lassjuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lassjug9 BASSTEL ; !
liekkok:liekkog9 BASSTEL ;
lisák+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:liság9 BASSTEL ; !
luogŋel+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:luogŋel BASSTEL ; !
luonduk:luondug9 BASSTEL ;
lurvek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lurveg9 BASSTEL ; !
lágŋet:lágŋed9 BASSTEL ;
lásjmak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lásjmag9 BASSTEL ; !
lásjmuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lásjmug9 BASSTEL ; !
lånjok+Err/Orth:lånjug9 BASSTEL ;
miedek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:miedeg9 BASSTEL ; !
mutták:muttág9 MUTTÁK ;
másjkuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:másjkug9 BASSTEL ; !
målkak:målkag9 MUTTÁK ;
mållåt:målºlåd9 BASSTEL ;
måskok:måskog9 BASSTEL ;
naják+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:najág9 BASSTEL ; !
nierbik:nierbig9 BASSTEL ;
njagok:njagog9 BASSTEL ;
njammet:njammed9 BASSTEL ;
njiŋŋelissjervak:njiŋŋelis#sjervag9 BASSTEL ;
njuvddel+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njuvddel BASSTEL ; !
njárbuk:njárbug9 BASSTEL ;
rabuk:rabug9 BASSTEL ;
ridák+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ridág9 MUTTÁK ; !
rievtuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rievtug9 BASSTEL ; !
ruopsuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruopsug9 BASSTEL ; !
rájgak:rájgag9 BASSTEL ;
råntsok:råntsog9 BASSTEL ;
sexak:sexag9 BASSTEL ; !GG
sjaddel+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sjaddel BASSTEL ; !
sjiehttel:sjiehttel BASSTEL ;
sjuovun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sjuovun BASSTEL ; !
skielgok+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:skielgog9 BASSTEL ; !
skárbak:skárb SKÁRBAK ;
snarrek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:snarreg9 BASSTEL ; !
snjurtjok+v2:sjnjurtjog9 BASSTEL ;
snjutjek+v2:sjnjutjeg9 BASSTEL ;
snurttel:snurttel BASSTEL ;
soabttsel+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:soabttsel BASSTEL ; !
starduk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stardug9 BASSTEL ; !
stávval:stávval BASSTEL ;
suolek+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:suoleg9 BASSTEL ; !
sárak:sárag9 BASSTEL ;
tjalmak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjalmag9 BASSTEL ; !
tjavguk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjavgug9 BASSTEL ; !
tjierggat+v1:tjierggad9 BASSTEL ;
tjuojvuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjuojvug9 BASSTEL ; !
tjuovggel:tjuovggel BASSTEL ;
tjáhppisdieblak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjáhppis#dieblak9 BASSTEL ; !
tjårguk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjårgug9 BASSTEL ; !
tsåhpåk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tsåhpåg9 BASSTEL ; !
usspar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:usspar BASSTEL ; !
viessovarák+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:viessovarág9 BASSTEL ; !
virmmel+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:virmmel BASSTEL ; !
vuolok+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuolog9 BASSTEL ; !
vuovdak:vuovdag9 BASSTEL ;
várrok+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:várrog9 BASSTEL ; !
ájádalák+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ájádalág9 BASSTEL ; !
árvas+Err/Orth:árvas MUTTÁK ; 
åhpak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:åhpag9 BASSTEL ; !
